Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5858.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11. (1) Except as provided in subsections subsection (6), and (7), there is levied upon on every owner of a speculative building, a new facility, or a replacement facility to which an industrial facilities exemption certificate is issued a specific tax to be known as the industrial facility tax and an administrative fee calculated in the same manner and at the same rate that the local tax collecting unit imposes on ad valorem taxes collected under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (2) The industrial facility tax and administrative fee are to must be paid annually, at the same times, in the same installments, and to the same officer or officers as taxes and administrative fees, if any, imposed under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155, are payable. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the officer or officers shall disburse the industrial facility tax payments received each year to and among the this state, cities, townships, villages, school districts, counties, and authorities, at the same times and in the same proportions as required by law for the disbursement of taxes collected under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. To determine the proportion for the disbursement of taxes under this subsection and for attribution of taxes under subsection (5) for taxes collected under industrial facilities exemption certificates issued before January 1, 1994, the number of mills levied for local school district operating purposes to be used in the calculation shall equal equals the number of mills for local school district operating purposes levied in 1993 minus the number of mills levied under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, for the year for which the disbursement is calculated. (3) Except as provided by subsections (4) and (5), for an intermediate school district receiving state aid under section 56, 62, or 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681, of the amount that would otherwise be disbursed to or retained by the intermediate school district, all or a portion, to be determined on the basis of the tax rates being utilized to compute the amount of the state school aid, shall must be paid instead to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund. established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. If the sum of any commercial facilities taxes prescribed by the commercial redevelopment act, 1978 PA 255, MCL 207.651 to 207.668, and the industrial facility taxes paid to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund that would otherwise be disbursed to the local or intermediate school district, under section 12 of the commercial redevelopment act, 1978 PA 255, MCL 207.662, and this section, exceeds the amount received by the local or intermediate school district under sections 56, 62, and 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681, the department of treasury shall allocate to each eligible local or intermediate school district an amount equal to the difference between the sum of the commercial facilities taxes and the industrial facility taxes paid to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund and the amount the local or intermediate school district received under sections 56, 62, and 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681. This subsection does not apply to taxes levied for either of the following: (a) Mills allocated to an intermediate school district for operating purposes as provided for under the property tax limitation act, 1933 PA 62, MCL 211.201 to 211.217a. (b) An intermediate school district that is not receiving state aid under section 56 or 62 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656 and 388.1662. (4) For industrial facilities taxes levied before 1994, a local or intermediate school district shall receive or retain its industrial facility tax payment that is levied in any year and becomes a lien before December 1 of the year if the district files a statement with the state treasurer not later than June 30 of the year certifying that the district does not expect to receive state school aid payments under section 56, 62, or 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681, in the state fiscal year commencing in the year this statement is filed and if the district did not receive state school aid payments under section 56, 62, or 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681, for the state fiscal year concluding in the year the statement required by this subsection is filed. However, if a local or intermediate school district receives or retains its summer industrial facility tax payment under this subsection and becomes entitled to receive state school aid payments under section 56, 62, or 81 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1656, 388.1662, and 388.1681, in the state fiscal year commencing in the year in which it filed the statement required by this subsection, the district immediately shall pay to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund an amount of the summer industrial facility tax payments that would have been paid to the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund under subsection (3) had not if this subsection had not allowed the district to receive or retain the summer industrial facility tax payment. (5) For industrial facilities taxes levied after 1993, the amount to be disbursed to a local school district, except for that amount of tax attributable to mills levied under section 1211(2) or 1211c of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1211 and 380.1211c, and mills that are not included as mills levied for school operating purposes under section 1211 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1211, shall must be paid to the state treasury and credited to the state school aid fund. established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (6) A speculative building, a new facility, or a replacement facility located in a renaissance zone under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, or a HOPE zone under the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act is exempt from the industrial facility tax levied under this act to the extent and for the duration provided pursuant to under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, or the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act, except for that portion of the industrial facility tax attributable to a special assessment or a tax described in section 7ff(2) or (9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. The industrial facility tax calculated under this subsection shall must be disbursed proportionately to the local taxing unit or units that levied the special assessment or the tax described in section 7ff(2) or (9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. (7) Upon application for an exemption under this subsection by a qualified start-up business, the governing body of a local tax collecting unit may adopt a resolution to exempt a speculative building, a new facility, or a replacement facility of a qualified start-up business from the collection of the industrial facility tax levied under this act in the same manner and under the same terms and conditions as provided for the exemption in section 7hh of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7hh. The clerk of the local tax collecting unit shall notify in writing the assessor of the local tax collecting unit and the legislative body of each taxing unit that levies ad valorem property taxes in the local tax collecting unit. Before acting on the resolution, the governing body of the local tax collecting unit shall afford the assessor and a representative of the affected taxing units an opportunity for a hearing. If a resolution authorizing the exemption is adopted in the same manner as provided in section 7hh of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7hh, a speculative building, a new facility, or a replacement facility owned or operated by a qualified start-up business is exempt from the industrial facility tax levied under this act, except for that portion of the industrial facility tax attributable to a special assessment or a tax described in section 7ff(2) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff, for the year in which the resolution is adopted. A qualified start-up business is not eligible for an exemption under this subsection for more than 5 years. A qualified start-up business may receive the exemption under this subsection in nonconsecutive years. The industrial facility tax calculated under this subsection shall be disbursed proportionately to the taxing unit or units that levied the special assessment or the tax described in section 7ff(2) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. As used in this subsection, "qualified start-up business" means that term as defined in section 31a of the single business tax act, 1975 PA 228, MCL 208.31a, or in section 415 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1415. (7) As used in this section, "state school aid fund" means the state school aid fund established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01123'25) or House Bill No. 5852 (request no. H01123'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05500'25) or House Bill No. 5856 (request no. H05500'25).